District of Columbia statutes.
50-2203.01

Negligent homicide.

Any person who, by the operation of any vehicle in a careless, reckless, or negligent manner, but not wilfully or wantonly, shall cause the death of another, including a pedestrian in a marked crosswalk, or unmarked crosswalk at an intersection, shall be guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 802(a)
June 17, 1935, 49 Stat. 385, ch. 266
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 160(a)(3)
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 8, 29 DCR 3138
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-174, § 14, 29 DCR 5753
Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-34, § 3, 34 DCR 5316
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 274, 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Traffic adjudication, violations prosecuted as criminal offenses, see § 50-2302.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2203.02, § 50-2203.03, § 50-2206.51, and § 50-2302.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-713.
1973 Ed., § 40-606.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “of not more than $5,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 274 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.